de: Heim & Garten > Zubehör für Kamine & Holzöfen: Ascheeimer und -schaufeln; Blasebälge; Kamin- & Holzofenroste; Feuerböcke; Kaminreflektoren; Kamingitter; Kaminwerkzeug; Feuerholz & Brennstoffe; Kaminbodenplatten; Zubehör für Feuerholz-Aufbewahrung; Feuerholz-Aufbewahrung; Holzofenventilatoren & -gebläse
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Pribor za kamin i peć na drva: Kante i lopate za pepeo; Mjehovi; Rešetke za kamin i peć na drva; Prijekladi za kamin; Reflektori za kamin; Zasloni za kamin; Alat za kamin; Drvo za ogrjev i goriva; Podloge za ognjište; Dodaci za stalke i nosače za cjepanice; Stalci i nosači za cjepanice; Ventilatori i puhala za peći na drva
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Acessórios para lareiras e salamandras: Baldes e pás para cinzas; Foles; Grelhas de lareiras e salamandras; Cães de lareira; Refletores de lareira; Ecrãs de lareira; Ferramentas de lareira; Lenha e combustível; Protetores de chão de lareira; Acessórios para transporte e armazenamento de lenha para lareira; Transporte e armazenamento de lenha para lareira; Ventiladores e lareiras de salamandras
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 壁炉与木炉配件: 灰桶/铲子; 风箱; 壁炉与木炉炉栅; 壁炉柴架; 壁炉反射板; 壁炉屏风; 壁炉工具; 木柴与燃料; 火炉底垫; 柴架配件; 柴架; 柴火炉风扇/鼓风机
cs: Dům a zahrada > Krby a kamna – příslušenství: Kbelíky a lopaty na popel; Měchy; Rošty do krbu a kamen; Železné rošty ke krbům; Odrazné desky ke krbům; Krbové zástěny; Krbové nářadí; Palivo a palivové dřevo; Podložky pod kamna a krby; Koše a nosiče na dřevo – příslušenství; Koše a nosiče na dřevo; Krbové ventilátory
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Takka- ja puu-uunitarvikkeet: Tuhkaämpärit ja -lapiot; Palkeet; Takan ja puu-uunin arinat; Kipinäkaaret; Takkaheijastimet; Kipinäsuojat; Takkavälineet; Polttopuu ja polttoaine; Tulisijan suojat; Halkotelineiden ja -korien lisätarvikkeet; Halkotelineet ja -korit; Puuhellan tuulettimet ja puhaltimet
nl: Huis en tuin > Accessoires voor haarden en houtkachels: Asemmers en asscheppen; Balgen; Krabbers voor haarden en houtovens; Haardijzers; Haardplaten; Haardschermen; Haardproducten; Brandhout en brandstof; Vloerplaten; Brandhoutrekken en -dragers; Brandhoutrekken; Ventilatoren voor houtkachel
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 벽난로/장작난로 부대용품: 재 버킷 및 삽; 풀무; 벽난로/장작난로 쇠살대; 벽난로 장작받침; 벽난로 반사판; 벽난로 보호대; 벽난로 도구; 장작/연료; 난로판; 장작 받침/운반대 부대용품; 장작 받침/운반대; 장작난로 환풍팬/송풍기
en: Home & Garden > Fireplace & Wood Stove Accessories: Ash Buckets & Shovels; Bellows; Fireplace & Wood Stove Grates; Fireplace Andirons; Fireplace Reflectors; Fireplace Screens; Fireplace Tools; Firewood & Fuel; Hearth Pads; Log Rack & Carrier Accessories; Log Racks & Carriers; Wood Stove Fans & Blowers
fr: Maison et jardin > Accessoires pour cheminées et poêles à bois: Seaux et pelles à cendres; Soufflets; Grilles pour poêles à bois et cheminées; Chenets de cheminée; Réflecteurs pour cheminées; Pare-feu; Outils de cheminée; Combustible et bois de chauffage; Plaques de sol; Accessoires pour range-bûches et porte-bûches; Sacs et paniers à bûches; Ventilateurs et soufflets pour poêles à bois
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phụ kiện cho bếp và lò sưởi: Xô & Xẻng Hốt Tro; Bễ thổi lò; Vỉ lò nướng; Vỉ lò sưởi; Gương phản xạ nhiệt cho lò sưởi; Tấm chắn lò; Dụng cụ lò sưởi; Củi và nhiên liệu; Tấm lát cửa lò sưởi; Phụ kiện giá để và túi đựng củi; Giá để và túi đựng củi; Quạt và ống bễ lò củi
hu: Otthon és kert > Kandalló- és tűzhely-kiegészítők: Hamuvödrök és lapátok; Tüzelőfúvókák; Kandalló- és tűzhelyrácsok; Kandalló-tüzelővasak; Kandallóreflektorok; Kandallóképernyők; Kandallóeszközök; Tűzifa és tüzelőanyag; Kandallóalátétek; Rönktartó- és hordozókiegészítők; Rönktartók és hordozók; Fakályha-ventilátorok és -fúvók
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 壁爐/柴爐配件: 灰燼桶與鏟子; 風箱; 壁爐/燒柴爐柵; 壁爐柴架; 壁爐反射面板; 壁爐屏風; 壁爐器具; 柴薪和燃料; 爐墊; 木柴架/木柴運輸用具配件; 木柴架和木柴運輸用具; 火爐風扇和風機
es: Casa y jardín > Accesorios para hornos de leña y chimeneas: Cubos y palas para cenizas; Fuelles; Rejillas para chimeneas y estufas de leña; Morillos para chimeneas; Reflectores para chimeneas; Pantallas para chimeneas; Herramientas para chimeneas; Leña y combustible; Bases de suelo para hornos de leña y chimeneas; Accesorios para bolsas y soportes de leña; Bolsas y soportes de leña; Ventiladores para chimeneas de leña
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Şömine ve Odun Sobası Aksesuarları: Kül Kovaları ve Kürekleri; Körükler; Şömine ve Odun Sobası Izgaraları; Şömine Altlıkları; Şömine Yansıtıcı Panelleri; Şömine Perdeleri; Şömine Avadanlıkları; Odun ve Yakıt; Soba Altlıkları; Odun Rafı ve Taşıyıcı Aksesuarları; Odun Raf ve Taşıyıcıları; Odun Sobası Fan ve Körükleri
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Аксесоари за камини и печки на дърва: Кофи и лопати за пепел; Духала; Решетки за камини и печки на дърва; Решетки за дърва в камина; Рефлектори за камини; Паравани за камина; Инструменти за камина; Дърва за огрев и гориво; Подложки за камина; Аксесоари за дърва и дървени рафтове; Рафтове за дърва и поставки; Вентилатори за печки на дърва и духалки
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 暖炉・薪ストーブ関連用品: 灰バケツ・シャベル; ふいご; 暖炉・薪ストーブ用火格子; 薪載せ台; 薪ストーブ用反射板; 暖炉用フェンス; ファイヤーツールセット; 薪・燃料; 炉台; ログラック・ログキャリー関連用品; ログラック・ログキャリー; 薪ストーブ用ファン・送風機
ru: Дом и сад > Аксессуары для каминов и дровяных печей: Ведра и лопаты для золы; Меха; Колосники для каминов и дровяных печей; Подставки для дров в камине; Рефлекторы для каминов; Защитные экраны для каминов; Инструменты для камина; Дрова и топливо; Подложки под печь; Аксессуары для дровниц и сумок для переноски дров; Дровницы и сумки для переноски дров; Вентиляторы и воздуходувки для дровяных печей
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Príslušenstvo pre krby a kachle: Nádoby a lopatky na popol; Dúchadlá; Krbové a kachlové rošty; Krbové rošty na drevo; Žiaruvzdorné zásteny; Krbové zásteny; Krbové náradie; Palivové drevo a podpaľovače; Podložky do krbu; Príslušenstvo k stojanom a nosičom; Stojany a nosiče na guľatinu; Ventilátory a dúchadlá pre kachle na drevo
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Accesorii pentru șemineuri și sobe cu lemne: Găleți și lopeți pentru cenușă; Burdufuri; Grătare pentru șemineuri și sobe cu lemne; Suporturi de fier pentru lemne șemineu; Panouri reflectorizante pentru șemineuri; Ecrane de protecție pentru șemineuri; Unelte pentru șemineuri; Lemne de foc și combustibil; Inserții pentru vatră; Accesorii pentru suporturi și dispozitive de transport pentru bușteni; Suporturi și dispozitive de transport pentru bușteni; Ventilatoare și suflante pentru sobe cu lemne
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Židinių ir krosnelių priedai: Pelenų kibirai ir kastuvai; Dumplės; Židinių ir krosnelių grotelės; Židinių andironai; Židinių reflektoriai; Židinių ekranai; Židinių įrankiai; Malkos ir kuras; Židinių paklotai; Malkų stovų ir neštuvų priedai; Malkų stovai ir neštuvai; Krosnelių ventiliatoriai ir pūstuvai
da: Hjem og have > Pejs og brændeovn – tilbehør: Askespande og skovle; Blæsebælge; Pejs og brændeovn – gitre; Ildbukke; Pejsereflektorer; Pejseskærme; Pejseredskaber; Brænde og brændstof; Pejsefliser; Brændekurve – tilbehør; Brændekurve; Brændekomfur – blæsere
it: Casa e giardino > Accessori caminetti e stufe a legna: Secchi e pale per la cenere; Mantici; Grate per caminetti e stufe a legna; Alari per camino; Piastre riflettenti; Parascintille; Accessori per caminetto; Legna da ardere/combustibile; Basamenti per focolare; Accessori per porta legna; Porta legna; Ventole/sfiatatoi stufe a legna
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Αξεσουάρ τζακιού & ξυλόσομπας: Κουβάδες και φτυάρια στάχτης; Φυσητήρες; Σχάρες τζακιού & σόμπας ξύλου; Στηρίγματα ξύλου τζακιού; Αντανακλαστικά τζακιού; Προστατευτικά οθόνης τζακιού; Εργαλεία τζακιού; Ξύλα για καύση & καύσιμα; Επιθέματα εστίας; Αξεσουάρ σχάρας & μεταφορέων ξύλων; Σχάρες & μεταφορείς ξύλων; Ανεμιστήρες & φυσητήρες σόμπας ξύλου
pl: Dom i ogród > Akcesoria do kominków i pieców opalanych węglem: Wiadra i łopatki do popiółu; Miechy; Paleniska kominków i pieców opalanych węglem; Ruszty kominkowe; Ekrany kominkowe; Kratki kominkowe; Narzędzia do kominków; Drewno opałowe i paliwo; Podkładki niepalne przed palenisko; Akcesoria do stojaków i pojemników na drewno; Stojaki i pojemniki na drewno; Wentylatory i dmuchawy do pieców opalanych drewnem
nb: Hjem og hage > Tilbehør til peiser og ovner: Askebøtter og spader; Belger; Rister og gitter til peiser og ovner; Peisbukker; Peisreflektorer; Peisskjermer; Peisverktøy; Fyringsved og drivstoff; Hjerteputer; Tilbehør for vedstativer og -bærere; Vedstativer og -bærere; Ovnsvifter og -blåsere
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์เตาผิงและเตาไม้: ถังและพลั่วสำหรับตักขี้เถ้า; ที่เป่าลม; ตะแกรงสำหรับเตาผิงและเตาไฟ; ขาหยั่งโลหะสำหรับเตาผิง; แผ่นสะท้อนสำหรับเตาผิง; ที่กั้นเตาผิง; เครื่องมือสำหรับเตาผิง; ฟืน; ที่รองพื้นเตา; อุปกรณ์ชั้นวางและที่ใส่ท่อนไม้; ที่เก็บฟืน; พัดลมและที่เป่าลมเตาไม้
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dodatki za kamine in peči na drva: Vedra in lopate za pepel; Mehi; Rešetke za kamine in peči na drva; Stojala za polena; Kaminski reflektorji; Zaščitne mreže za kamine; Orodja za kamin; Drva in gorivo; Podloge za ognjišče; Dodatki za stojala in nosilce za polena; Stojala in nosilci za polena; Ventilatorji in razpihovalniki za peči na drva
sv: Hem och trädgård > Tillbehör till öppna spisar och vedspisar: Askhinkar och -spadar; Bälgar; Spisgaller för öppna spisar och vedspisar; Eldställ för öppna spisar; Reflektorer för öppna spisar; Skärmar för öppna spisar; Verktyg för öppna spisar; Brasved och bränsle; Eldstadsplan; Tillbehör till vedställ och vedkorgar; Vedställ och vedkorgar; Fläktar och blästrar till vedspisar
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Acessórios para lareira e fogão à lenha: Baldes e pás para cinzas; Foles; Redes para lareiras e fornos a lenha; Grades para lareira; Refletores de lareira; Telas para lareira; Ferramentas para lareira; Lenha e combustível; Assoalhos de lareira; Acessórios para prateleiras de lenha e madeira; Prateleiras para lenha e madeira; Ventiladores e sopradores para lareiras